Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.121.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "College" means the Washington State University college of veterinary medicine.

(2) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a food animal veterinarian in this state.

(3) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at least six credit hours or the equivalent, is making satisfactory academic progress as defined by the college, has declared veterinary medicine for his or her major, and has a declared intention to practice veterinary medicine with an emphasis in food animal medicine in the state of Washington.

(4) "Food animal" means any species commonly recognized as livestock including, but not limited to, poultry, cattle, swine, and sheep.

(5) "Food animal veterinarian" means a veterinarian licensed and registered under chapter 18.92 RCW and engaged in general and food animal practice as a primary specialty, who has at least fifty percent of his or her practice time devoted to large production animal veterinary practice.

(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to practice veterinary medicine with an emphasis in food animal medicine in the state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.

(7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(8) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

(9) "University" means Washington State University.

[ 2008 c 208 s 2.]